Utah statutes.
63G-6-803.   Costs to or against protestor.
(1)  When a protest is sustained administratively or upon administrative or
judicial review and the protesting bidder or offeror should have been awarded
the contract under the solicitation but is not, the protestor shall be
entitled to the following relief as a claim against the state:
(a)  the reasonable costs incurred in connection with the solicitation,
including bid preparation and appeal costs; and
(b)  any equitable relief determined to be appropriate by the reviewing
administrative or judicial body.
(2)  When a protest is not sustained by the Procurement Appeals Board, the
protestor shall reimburse the Division of Purchasing and General Services for
the per diem and expenses paid by the division to witnesses or appeals board
members and any additional expenses incurred by the state agency staff who
have provided materials and administrative services to the board for that
case.
